Washington statutes.
RCW 42.04.020

Eligibility to hold office.

That no person shall be competent to qualify for or hold any elective public office within the state of Washington, or any county, district, precinct, school district, municipal corporation or other district or political subdivision, unless he or she be a citizen of the United States and state of Washington and an elector of such county, district, precinct, school district, municipality or other district or political subdivision.

[ 2012 c 117 s 94; 1919 c 139 s 1; RRS s 9929. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 3050 codified as RCW 42.04.021.]

NOTES:

Apple commission, qualifications of members: RCW 15.24.020.

Attorney general, qualifications: RCW 43.10.010.

Cities, council-manager plan, qualifications of city manager: RCW 35.18.040.

Cities and towns, residence qualifications of officials and employees: RCW 35.21.200.

County hospital board of trustees, eligibility: RCW 36.62.140.

Court administrator: RCW 2.56.010.

Court commissioners, qualifications: RCW 2.24.010.

Dairy products commission, members, qualifications: RCW 15.44.030.

Electors, qualifications: State Constitution Art. 6 s 1 (Amendment 5).

Engineers and land surveyors' board of registration, qualifications: RCW 18.43.030.

Fire protection district commissioners, qualifications: RCW 52.14.010.

Fish and wildlife commission members, qualifications: RCW 77.04.040.

Flood control districts, qualifications of governing board: RCW 85.38.070.

Fruit commission, qualifications of members: RCW 15.28.030.

Hardwoods commission, qualifications: RCW 15.74.010.

Honey bee commission, qualifications: RCW 15.62.060.

Horse racing commission, qualifications: RCW 67.16.012.

Judges of superior court, eligibility: State Constitution Art. 4 s 17.

Judges of supreme court, eligibility: State Constitution Art. 4 s 17.

Legislators, eligibility: State Constitution Art. 2 s 7; Art. 2 s 14.

Mosquito control district board members, qualifications: RCW 17.28.120.

Municipal court judges, qualifications: RCW 35.20.170.

Prosecuting attorney, eligibility: RCW 36.27.010.

Public utility district commissioners, qualifications: RCW 54.12.010.

Religious qualification to hold public office or employment prohibited: State Constitution Art. 1 s 11 (Amendment 4).

Residence for eligibility to public office: State Constitution Art. 6 s 4.

School directors, qualifications: RCW 28A.343.340.

School teachers, qualifications: RCW 28A.410.025, 28A.405.040.

State hospitals for individuals with mental illness, superintendents' powers: RCW 72.23.030.

State officers, eligibility: State Constitution Art. 3 s 25 (Amendment 31).

State schools for blind and deaf, qualifications of superintendents: RCW 72.40.020.

Superior court reporters, qualifications: RCW 2.32.180.

Towns, eligibility of officers: RCW 35.27.080.

Utilities and transportation commission, qualifications: RCW 80.01.020.

Veterinary board members, qualifications: RCW 18.92.021.

Weed district director and electors, qualifications: RCW 17.04.070.

Wine commission, qualifications: RCW 15.88.030.